California, session 20252026, AB2171.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18919.5 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:18919.5. (a) Notwithstanding Section 18919.1, the State Department of Social Services shall prohibit CalFresh recipients from using CalFresh benefits to purchase sweetened drinks or candy. candy, except at restaurants.(b) Notwithstanding Section 18919.1, if the State Department of Social Services determines that a waiver or authorization from the United States Department of Agriculture is necessary for implementation of this section, the State Department of Social Services shall request the waiver or authorization and may delay implementing this section until the waiver or authorization is granted. (c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Candy” is limited to candy that is ordinarily packaged and sold for consumption without further preparation.(2) “Restaurant” includes, but is not limited to, an on-campus qualifying food facility, as defined in Section 66025.93 of the Education Code, an eat-in establishment, a grocery store delicatessen, and a takeaway-only restaurant. “Restaurant” does not include a restaurant specifically excluded, by federal law or guidance or state law or guidance, from participation in a program associated with CalFresh or the food assistance program described in Section 18930.(2)(3) “Sweetened drink” means a nonalcoholic beverage made with water that contains five grams or more of added sugar or any amount of artificial sweeteners. “Sweetened drink” does not include a beverage that contains any of the following:(A) Milk or milk products.(B) Soy, rice, or similar milk substitutes.(C) More than 50 percent of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.SEC. 2. Section 18930.2 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:18930.2. When the State Department of Social Services prohibits CalFresh recipients from using CalFresh benefits to purchase sweetened drinks or candy pursuant to Section 18919.5 and to the extent permissible under federal law, the department shall also prohibit the purchase of sweetened drinks or candy candy, except at restaurants, with benefits provided pursuant to the food assistance program described in Section 18930.